Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2631.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1103 of Title 4 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding definitions to read:§ 1103. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this part shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:* * *"School entity." A school district, intermediate unit, area career and technical school, charter school, cyber charter school or regional charter school."School property." Any public school grounds and buildings owned by or under the control of a school entity.* * *12345678910111213141516171819 Section 2. Section 13B63(c) of Title 4 is amended to read:§ 13B63. Internet cafes and prohibition.* * *(c) Computer access.--An interactive gaming certificate holder [or], interactive gaming operator, sports wagering certificate holder or sports wagering operator shall prevent the following registered players [within a licensed facility] from accessing authorized interactive games or sports wagering as provided in Chapter 13C (relating to sports wagering) on the registered player's own computers or other devices through the use of geospatial technologies[.]:(1) registered players within a licensed facility; and(2) registered players located within the boundaries of school property.Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2631PN3594 - 2 - 123456789101112131415